Mississippi, session 2026, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) The overpass bridge system connecting Interstate 55 to Interstate 20, known as the "Stack," and located in Hinds and Rankin Counties, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the "Charlie Kirk Memorial Overpass." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.